ja: 指標設計: ボバー/ボール; チェーンボビン; ドロップオフ; フロート; ハンガー; パテ; スプリングボバーチップ; スティックオンオーバル; スイングアーム; ヤーン; その他
hu: Kapásjelző kialakítása: Úszó/golyó; Láncos swinger; Ejtős kapásjelző; Úszó; Hanger; Ólompaszta; Rugós kapásjelző; Ragasztható ovális; Merevkaros swinger; Fonal; Egyéb
lt-LT: Indikatoriaus dizainas: Plūdė / rutuliukas; Grandinėlės ritė; Atsikabinantis; Plūdė; Pakabukas; Masė; Spyruoklinis plūdės antgalis; Priklijuojamas ovalas; Svyruojanti svirtis; Siūlai; Kita
pt-BR: Indicador design: Boia/bola; Bobina de corrente; Drop-off; Boia; Enforcador; Massa; Ponta de boia com mola; Adesivo oval; Braço oscilante; Fio; Outro
fi: Ilmaisimen muotoilu: Pallokoho; Ketjuindikaattori; Drop-off-indikaattori; Koho; Riippuindikaattori; Vahaindikaattori; Jousitettu kärki-indikaattori; Liimattava ovaali; Keinuindikaattori; Lanka; Muu
sk-SK: Dizajn indikátora: Plavák/guľôčka; Retiazkový bobbin; Závesný indikátor (drop-off); Plavák; Závesný (hanger); Záberový tmel; Pružinový indikátor; Nalepovací ovál; Kyvné rameno (swinger); Vlákno; Iné
sl-SI: Zasnova indikatorja: Plovec/kroglica; Verižni indikator; Snemljivi indikator; Plovec; Viseči indikator prijema; Kit za indikacijo prijema; Vzmetni indikator; Nalepni ovalni indikator; Zgibna ročica (swing arm); Indikator iz preje; Drugo
ro-RO: Proiectarea indicatorilor: Plută/bilă; Bobină cu lanț; Drop-off; Plută; Hanger; Pastă; Vârf de plută cu arc; Oval adeziv; Braț oscilant; Fir de lână; Altele
da: Indikatorens design: Flåd/kugle; Kædebobbin; Drop-off; Flåd; Hanger; Putty; Fjeder-bobber-spids; Selvklæbende oval; Svingarm; Garn; Andet
nl: Indicator ontwerp: Dobber/bal; Kettingwaker; Drop-off; Dobber; Hanger; Putty; Verende dobbertop; Ovale plakdobber; Swingarm; Garen; Overige
cs: Návrh indikátoru: Splávek/kulička; Řetízkový indikátor (bobbin); Drop-off indikátor; Splávek; Hanger; Tmel; Pružinový indikátor; Nalepovací ovál; Výkyvné rameno (swinger); Příze; Jiné
zh-CN: 指示器设计: 浮漂/浮球; 链式咬钩指示器; 脱落式; 浮标; 吊环式; 指示泥; 弹簧浮标尖端; 粘贴式椭圆形; 摇臂式; 纱线指示器; 其他
ru: Конструкция индикатора: Поплавок/шарик; Боббин на цепочке; Отвесной (drop-off); Поплавок; Хэнгер; Паста-индикатор; Кивок (пружинный); Наклейка-овал; Свингер; Пряжа; Другое
de: Design des Bissanzeigers: Schwimmer/Kugel; Kettenbobbin; Drop-off; Pose; Hänger; Knete; Spring-Bobber-Spitze; Ovall zum Aufkleben; Pendelbissanzeiger; Garn; Sonstige
nb: Indikatordesign: Dupp/ball; Kjedeindikator; Drop-off; Dupp; Hanger; Kitt; Fjærindikator; Selvklebende oval; Svingarm; Garn; Annet
sv: Design Indikator: Flöte/boll; Kedjeindikator; Drop-off; Flöte; Hanger; Putty; Fjäderindikator; Självhäftande oval; Svingarm; Garn; Övrigt
es: Diseño de indicadores: Flotador/bola; Bobina de cadena; Drop-off; Flotador; Colgador; Masilla; Punta de boya con resorte; Óvalo adhesivo; Brazo oscilante; Lana; Otro
hr-HR: Dizajn indikatora: Plovak/kugla; Lančani indikator; Drop-off indikator; Plovak; Viseći indikator; Pasta; Opružni vrh; Samoljepljivi oval; Zglobni indikator; Konac; Ostalo
en: Indicator design: Bobber/ball; Chain bobbin; Drop-off; Float; Hanger; Putty; Spring bobber tip; Stick-on oval; Swing arm; Yarn; Other
fr: Forme de l’indicateur: Bouchon/boule; Chaînette avec bobine; Drop-off; Flotteur; Balancier; Pâte; Embout de scion à ressort; Ovale adhésif; Bras oscillant; Fil de laine; Autre
bg-BG: Дизайн на индикатора: Плувка/топче; Обтегач с верижка; Падащ обтегач; Плувка; Хенгер (обтегач); Паста/пластелин; Пружинен кивок; Залепващ се овал; Суингър (обтегач с рамо); Прежда; Други
el: Σχεδιασμός δείκτη: Φελλός/μπάλα; Βαριδάκι με αλυσίδα; Αποσπώμενο; Φελλός; Εκκρεμές; Πλαστελίνη; Μύτη με φελλό ελατηρίου; Αυτοκόλλητο οβάλ; Βραχίονας ταλάντωσης; Νήμα; Άλλο
it: Design dell'indicatore: Galleggiante/sfera; Avvisatore a catenella; Drop-off; Galleggiante; Hanger; Pasta; Cimino con avvisatore a molla; Ovale adesivo; Avvisatore a braccio oscillante; Filato; Altro
th: การออกแบบอุปกรณ์แจ้งเตือน: ทุ่น/ลูกบอล; บ็อบบินโซ่; แบบดรอปออฟ; ทุ่นลอย; แบบแขวน; พุตตี้; ปลายทุ่นสปริง; วงรีแบบติด; สวิงอาร์ม; ไหมพรม; อื่นๆ
ko: 지표 설계: 바버/볼; 체인 보빈; 드롭오프; 플로트; 행어; 퍼티; 스프링 바버 팁; 스티커 부착형 타원; 스윙 암; 얀; 기타
zh-TW: 指示器設計: 圓形浮標/球形; 鏈條搖擺器; 掉落式; 浮標; 懸掛式; 黏土式; 彈簧浮標尖端; 黏貼橢圓式; 搖臂式; 毛線式; 其他
pl: Konstrukcja wskaźnika: Kula/bombka; Hanger na łańcuszku; Drop-off; Spławik; Hanger; Pasta sygnalizacyjna (Putty); Kiwak sprężynowy; Przyklejany owal; Swinger (Swing arm); Z przędzy (Yarn); Inny
vi: Thiết kế chỉ báo: Phao/bóng; Phao chuỗi; Chỉ báo thả mồi; Phao; Móc treo; Bột nhão; Đầu phao lò xo; Phao dán hình bầu dục; Tay quay/Tay đòn; Sợi len; Khác
pt-PT: Design de indicadores: Boia/bola; Bobina de corrente; Drop-off; Boia; Pêndulo; Massa; Ponteira com mola; Oval autocolante; Braço oscilante; Fio; Outro
tr: Gösterge tasarımı: Şamandıra/top; Zincirli bobin; Drop-off; Şamandıra; Askı; Macun; Yaylı şamandıra ucu; Yapışkanlı oval; Sallanan kol; İplik; Diğer